North Dakota, session 69, HB1223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-19-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
15.1-19-09. Students - Suspension and expulsion - Rules.
1. The board of a school district shall adopt rules regarding the suspension and expulsion of a
student. The rules for expulsion must provide for a procedural due process hearing in the
manner provided for inunder subsection 2 of section 15.1-19-10, before the determination to
expel a student is made. A student's parent or representative must be allowed to participate in
the expulsion hearing.
2. A school district may suspend a student may be suspended for up to ten days for
insubordination, habitual indolence, disorderly conduct, or for violating a school district
weapons policy.
3. A school district may suspend a student who is enrolled in an alternative education program
for which state per student payments are available may be suspended for up to twenty days
for insubordination, habitual indolence, disorderly conduct, or for violating a school district
weapons policy.
4. A school district may expel a student, including one enrolled in an alternative education
program, may be expelled from schoolfor up to twelve months for insubordination, habitual
indolence, or disorderly conduct; provided the expulsion does not last beyond the termination
of the current school year. A student who violates the school district's weapons policy may be
expelled for up to twelve months. The school district shall consider the severity of the
infraction, the age of the student, and the disciplinary history of the student to determine the
duration of the expulsion. If the student satisfies the conditions for reinstatement established
by the school district, if any, the school district may review and reduce the duration of the
expulsion. A student who violates the school district's weapons policy may be expelled under
section 15.1 - 19 - 10 .

H. B. NO. 1223 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1223.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State